New York, session 2025-2026, A731.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 70.06 of the 2 penal law, as amended by chapter 410 of the laws of 1979, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (a) A second felony offender is a person, other than a second violent 5 felony offender as defined in section 70.04, who stands convicted of a 6 felony defined in this chapter or in the vehicle and traffic law, other 7 than a class A-I felony, after having previously been subjected to one 8 or more predicate felony convictions as defined in paragraph (b) of this 9 subdivision. 10 § 2. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subdivision 1 of section 160.10 of the 11 criminal procedure law, paragraph (b) as amended by chapter 762 of the 12 laws of 1971 and paragraph (c) as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 13 2021, are amended to read as follows: 14 (b) A misdemeanor defined in the penal law or the vehicle and traffic 15 law; or 16 (c) A misdemeanor defined outside the penal law or the vehicle and 17 traffic law which would constitute a felony if such person had a previ- 18 ous judgment of conviction for a crime. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02617-01-5